Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
PART 2 State Highway System
32-6-81.
Revocation or withholding of permits for illegal or unauthorized actions against the department’s property.

It shall be cause for the department to revoke a sign permit or refuse to issue a sign permit if any of the department’s property on the rights of way, including but not limited to trees, vegetation, or fences, is destroyed, damaged, converted, or altered by or on behalf of a person, firm, or corporation who owns, erects, maintains, leases, or uses any sign which is controlled by this part. When the department believes that any of the aforesaid property has been destroyed, damaged, converted, or altered, the department shall make a preliminary investigation and based on its findings may:

Revoke the permit or permits of any owner of a sign or signs if the department determines that the person, firm, or corporation who owns the land or who owns, erects, maintains, leases, or uses the sign or signs caused, hired, procured, or consciously or by design consented to any of the illegal acts described in this paragraph at or near the sign site, thereby depriving the sign owner of the permit to use that site; or

Refuse to issue a permit or permits for a sign site or sites for a period not to exceed five years if the department determines that the applicant has caused, hired, procured, or consciously or by design consented to any of the illegal acts described in this subsection on the department’s rights of way within 500 feet on either side of that sign site or sites.

Before the actions listed in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section may be taken, the department shall give 30 days’ written notice via certified mail or statutory overnight delivery to the permit holder; and this notice shall apprise the permit holder of a hearing that will be held in accordance with Code Sections 50-13-13 through 50-13-18. If the action described in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section is taken, the department shall state this in its refusal to issue a permit, and the applicant shall have the right to an administrative review of this action as provided by Code Sections 50-13-13 through 50-13-18.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-930.2, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1017, § 8; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that the 2000 amendment was applicable to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

32-6-82.
Acquisition by department of property rights in outdoor advertising which does not comply with requirements of part.

The department is authorized to acquire by purchase, gift, or condemnation and to pay just compensation for any property rights in outdoor advertising signs, displays, and devices which were lawfully erected in compliance with the applicable laws in effect at the time of erection but which do not conform to this part or which fail to comply with this part due to changed conditions beyond the control of the sign owner. The department shall be limited to an expenditure of $5 million for the state’s portion of just compensation. The department shall be prohibited from paying more than 25 percent of any award for just compensation.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, Ex. Sess., p. 5, § 11; Code 1933, § 95A-923, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1422, § 33.

32-6-83.
Acquisition by municipal corporation or county of outdoor advertising which does not comply with requirements of applicable ordinances, regulations, or resolutions.

Any municipal corporation or county is authorized to acquire by purchase, gift, or condemnation and to pay just compensation for any property rights in outdoor advertising signs, displays, and devices which were lawfully erected but which do not conform with the provisions of any lawful ordinance, regulation, or resolution or which at a later date fail to comply with the provisions of any lawful ordinance, regulation, or resolution due to changed conditions beyond the control of the sign owner. No municipal corporation or county shall remove or cause to be removed any such nonconforming outdoor advertising sign, display, or device without paying just compensation. Such compensation shall be paid in accordance with the conditions stated in Code Section 32-6-84. For the purposes of this Code section, the term “devices” means light, lighting fixtures, or other fixtures which are permanently attached to an advertising sign or display.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 423, § 8; Code 1933, § 95A-923.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 803, § 1.

Law reviews.

For article surveying legislative and judicial developments in Georgia local government law for 1978-79, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 155 (1979).

32-6-84.
Interests and losses which may be compensable under Code Sections 32-6-82 and 32-6-83.

The compensation provided for in Code Sections 32-6-82 and 32-6-83 is authorized to be paid only for the following:

The taking from the owner of such sign, display, or device of all right, title, leasehold, and interest in such sign, display, or device;

The taking from the owner of the real property on which the sign, display, or device is located of the right to erect and maintain such signs, displays, and devices thereon;

The actual financial loss suffered by the lessee under a written lease expressly and solely permitting the erection and maintenance of a sign, display, or device (which was lawful on the date such lease was executed) because of the refusal by the department to issue a permit for the erection of such sign, display, or device, provided that the amount of compensation paid may not exceed the pro rata part of the entire rental paid and to be paid under such lease for the unelapsed portion thereof remaining on July 1, 1973; or

The actual financial loss suffered by the lessor under a written lease expressly and solely permitting the erection and maintenance of a sign, display, or device (which was lawful on the date such lease was executed) because of the refusal by the department to issue a permit for the erection of such sign, display, or device, provided that the amount of compensation paid may not exceed the pro rata part of the entire rental paid and to be paid under such lease for the unelapsed portion thereof remaining on July 1, 1973.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 423, § 8; Ga. L. 1971, Ex. Sess., p. 5, § 12; Code 1933, § 95A-924, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 32.

32-6-85.
Department’s exercise of eminent domain power to acquire interests specified in Code Section 32-6-84.

Whenever it is necessary, in the judgment of the commissioner, to acquire those interests specified in Code Section 32-6-84, the department may exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner provided in Article 1 of Chapter 3 of this title for the acquisition of real property needed for the construction of highways.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 423, § 9; Ga. L. 1971, Ex. Sess., p. 5, § 13; Code 1933, § 95A-925, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-6-86.
Compensation contingent upon federal matching funds.

The department shall not acquire any sign by purchase or condemnation, any portion of the cost of which is eligible for federal participation, until such time as federal matching funds have been apportioned to and made available to the department for such acquisition. No sign shall be acquired by condemnation, except after three months’ written notice has been given to the owner thereof of the intention to so acquire the same, during which time the penalties provided by this part shall not apply.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, Ex. Sess., p. 5, § 14; Code 1933, § 95A-926, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

U.S. Code.

For provisions regarding authorization of federal matching funds, referred to in this Code section, see

23 U.S.C. § 131(m)

.

32-6-87.
Agreements with United States Secretary of Transportation.

Subject to the provisions of this part, the department is authorized, on behalf of the state, to enter into agreements with the United States Secretary of Transportation (as provided in Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code) relating to the control of outdoor advertising in areas adjacent to the interstate and primary systems, including the establishment of information centers at safety rest areas. The department is also authorized to take action in the name of the state to comply with the terms of such agreements.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, Ex. Sess., p. 5, § 22; Code 1933, § 95A-934, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-6-87.1.
“RV friendly” markers.

Subject to the prior approval of the Federal Highway Administration, the department is directed to incorporate the use of “RV friendly” markers on specific service signs for business establishments that cater to the needs of persons driving recreational vehicles. A business establishment that qualifies for participation in the specific service sign program and that also qualifies as “RV friendly” may request that an “RV friendly” marker be displayed immediately adjacent to such establishment’s business logo sign on the appropriate background sign panel. For purposes of this Code section, the “RV friendly” marker to be displayed shall be such marker as may be approved by the Federal Highway Administration in the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices.

In accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” and subject to the approval of the Federal Highway Administration, the department shall promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary to implement the provisions of this Code section, including the promulgation of rules and regulations setting forth the minimum requirements that business establishments must meet in order to qualify as “RV friendly.” Such requirements shall include, but shall not be limited to, the availability at each qualifying business establishment of parking spaces, entrances and exits in sufficient number and of sufficient size and dimensions to easily accommodate recreational vehicles, and the presence of appropriate overhang clearances at all facilities, if applicable.

For the purposes of assisting the Federal Highway Administration in considering the approval of an “RV friendly” marker for incorporation into the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices, the department is directed to submit a request to the Federal Highway Administration for permission to experiment with the use of an “RV friendly” marker on specific service signs in accordance with this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-6-87.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 45, § 1/SB 87; Ga. L. 2008, p. 324, § 32/SB 455.

32-6-88.
Designation of defined areas where directional information is provided by previously conforming signs or devices.

Upon written request made by any county, city, corporation, partnership, association, person, or persons, the board is authorized to consider and to designate a specific area or areas as a defined area or areas, upon a showing having been made that the area in question contains directional signs, displays, or devices which were lawfully erected under state law in force at the time of erection and in existence on May 5, 1976, and which do not conform to the requirements of paragraphs (1) through (6) of Code Section 32-6-72 and paragraphs (1) through (4) of Code Section 32-6-73, and upon a further showing that such directional signs, displays, and devices provide directional information about goods and services in the specific interest of the traveling public and that their removal would work a substantial economic hardship in such defined area or areas.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-934.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1086, § 5.

32-6-89.
Retention of directional signs, displays, and devices in defined areas.

Upon designation made by the board of an area or areas as a defined area or areas for purposes of requesting the approval of the United States Secretary of Transportation for the retention of directional signs, displays, and devices in the specific interest of the traveling public, the Georgia Department of Transportation is authorized to request the approval of the United States Secretary of Transportation.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-934.2, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1086, § 5; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 32.

32-6-90.
Promulgation of rules and regulations by department.

The department is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations governing the issuance and revocation of permits for the erection and maintenance of outdoor advertising which is authorized by Code Sections 32-6-72 and 32-6-73 and which is not prohibited by this part. The department is further authorized to promulgate rules and regulations governing the issuance, revocation, and renewal of permits for the trimming of trees and vegetation on the state’s rights of way authorized by and in accordance with Code Section 32-6-75.3. Such rules and regulations shall be consistent with the safety and welfare of the traveling public, and as may be necessary to carry out the policy of the state declared in this part, and consistent with the purposes of the Highway Beautification Act of 1965, Public Law 89-285, as amended, and contained in Title 23, United States Code. The department is further authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary to carry out this part.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 423, § 5; Ga. L. 1971, Ex. Sess., p. 5, § 8; Code 1933, § 95A-920, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1422, § 31; Ga. L. 1977, p. 263, § 6; Ga. L. 1981, p. 955, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1313, § 4.

Law reviews.

For review of 1998 legislation relating to highways, bridges, and ferries, see 15 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 136 (1998).

32-6-91.
Erection or maintenance of sign without permit as constituting misdemeanor.

Any person who erects or maintains any sign for which a permit is required by this part without a valid permit or renewal of such permit issued by the department shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Each day or fraction thereof during which a sign is unlawfully maintained shall constitute a separate offense. The commissioner and officials or employees of said department designated by the commissioner are authorized to take such actions as may be necessary or appropriate to procure the prosecution and conviction of any person, firm, or corporation violating this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, Ex. Sess., p. 5, § 15; Code 1933, § 95A-927, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-6-92.
Maintenance of unauthorized sign as constituting misdemeanor.

Any person who maintains any sign not authorized by this part and which was not lawfully in existence on October 6, 1971, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Each day or fraction thereof during which a sign is unlawfully maintained shall constitute a separate offense. The commissioner and officials or employees of the department designated by the commissioner are authorized to take such actions as may be necessary or appropriate to procure the prosecution and conviction of any person, firm, or corporation violating this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, Ex. Sess., p. 5, § 16; Code 1933, § 95A-928, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-6-93.
Erection or maintenance of sign without a permit as constituting a public nuisance; enjoining erection or maintenance of such sign.

The erection or maintenance by any person, firm, or corporation of any sign for which a permit is required by this part without a valid permit or renewal thereof issued by the department is declared to be a public nuisance. In addition to the remedies provided for in this part or which may otherwise exist under the laws of Georgia, the department is authorized to bring an equitable proceeding to enjoin any person, firm, or corporation from erecting or maintaining, without a valid permit or renewal thereof, any sign for which a permit or renewal thereof is required by this part. It shall not be necessary for the department to allege and prove that there is no adequate remedy at law in order to obtain the equitable relief provided for in this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, Ex. Sess., p. 5, § 17; Code 1933, § 95A-929, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-6-94.
Maintenance of unauthorized sign as constituting a public nuisance; enjoining maintenance of such sign.

The maintenance by any person, firm, or corporation of any sign which is not authorized by this part and which was not lawfully in existence on October 6, 1971, is declared to be a public nuisance. In addition to the remedies provided for in this part or which may otherwise exist under the laws of Georgia, the department is authorized to bring an equitable proceeding to enjoin any person, firm, or corporation from maintaining any sign which is not in compliance with this Code section. It shall not be necessary for the department to allege and prove that there is no adequate remedy at law in order to obtain the equitable relief provided for in this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, Ex. Sess., p. 5, § 18; Code 1933, § 95A-930, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-6-95.
Applicability of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” to part generally; affirmance of agency decision by operation of law.

In addition to the procedures and remedies afforded by this part, any person, firm, or corporation who owns, uses, leases, or subleases any outdoor advertising sign which is controlled by this part or who owns property on which a sign is located shall be subject to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” with respect to the erection, maintenance, or use of outdoor advertising signs.

It is specifically declared that the procedures provided in Code Sections 50-13-13 through 50-13-22 may be employed in cases wherein the department believes that a sign has been erected or is being maintained or used in violation of this part. After conducting the hearing required by Code Section 50-13-13, the commissioner or the commissioner’s designee, hearing officer, or others are authorized to issue an order requiring the disassembly and removal of any sign which has been administratively determined to be illegal as defined by paragraph (6) of Code Section 32-6-71. In the event that the commissioner or the commissioner’s designee, hearing officer, or others find that a sign is illegal and order its disassembly and removal, the party or parties against whom the order is directed shall be given 120 days from the date of the order in which to disassemble and remove the sign. In the event the party or parties against whom the order is directed fail to comply with the order, the department may disassemble and remove the sign in accordance with Code Section 32-6-96.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, when a petition for judicial review of a final decision of the commissioner or the commissioner’s designee, hearing officer, or others in any matter arising under this title is filed pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” if the superior court in which the petition for review is filed does not hear the case within 120 days from the date the petition for review is filed with the court, the final agency decision shall be considered affirmed by operation of law unless a hearing originally scheduled to be heard within 120 days has been continued to a date certain by order of the court. In the event a hearing is held later than 120 days after the date the petition for review is filed with the superior court because a hearing originally scheduled to be heard within the 120 days has been continued to a date certain by order of the court, the final agency decision shall be considered affirmed by operation of law if no order of the court disposing of the issues presented for review has been entered within 60 days after the date of the continued hearing. If a case is heard within 120 days from the date the petition for review is filed, the final agency decision shall be considered affirmed by operation of law if no order of the court dispositive of the issues presented for review has been entered within 60 days of the date of the hearing.

A decision of the agency affirmed by operation of law under subsection (c) of this Code section shall be subject to appellate review in the same manner as a decision of the superior court. The date of entry of judgment for purposes of appeal pursuant to Code Section 5-6-35 of a decision affirmed by operation of law without action of the superior court shall be the last date on which the superior court could have taken action under subsection (c) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-930.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1017, § 7; Ga. L. 1993, p. 969, § 1.

32-6-96.
Authority of department to enter upon private lands to implement administrative decisions; reimbursement of department for expenses; return or disposition of stored sign remnants.

After notifying the landowner by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, in cases where an administrative order has been issued by the commissioner or his designee, hearing officer, or others requiring the removal of an illegal outdoor advertising sign and the order has become a final decision, the department shall be authorized to enter upon privately owned lands for the purposes of effectuating the administrative order requiring disassembly and removal of illegal signs, provided the order issued authorizes this action by the department.

The disassembly and removal of any illegal sign by the department shall begin only after an inspection of the sign site has been made by an employee of the department and it is found that the sign has not been removed and an affidavit of the employee reflecting this finding has been filed by the department in the closed administrative record in the case. When the department disassembles and removes a sign, it shall be done as expeditiously as reasonably possible during daylight hours of regular working days, and it shall be done in a manner so as to cause as little inconvenience to the property owner as is possible under the circumstances. The outdoor advertising sign shall be removed to the nearest convenient field or district office of the department which is suitable for storage of the sign.

An itemization of the expenses incurred by the department for the disassembly, removal, transportation, and storage may be kept and a statement for the expenses incurred may be sent via certified mail or statutory overnight delivery to the party or parties against whom the order requiring the disassembly and removal is directed. It shall be the duty of the party or parties to reimburse the department for the expenses incurred by the department for the disassembly, removal, transportation, and storage of the sign. In the event the expenses are not paid in full within 30 days of receipt of the itemized statement, the department in its discretion may:

Institute a civil action to recover these unpaid expenses;

Utilize any other collection procedures authorized by law; or

Refuse to issue a permit or permits to the party or parties from whom the expenses are due for any outdoor advertising site until such expenses are paid.

However, if the party or parties dispute the itemized amount or dispute that the expenses are due, the party or parties may deposit the sum claimed due with the department or post a bond with good security in an amount equal to the sum claimed due, such bond to be approved by the department, and the party or parties shall then request a hearing and the controversy shall be decided in accordance with Code Sections 50-13-13 through 50-13-18. Until such a final determination is made, the department shall not refuse to issue a permit or permits.

If the party or parties against whom the order is directed pay the itemized expenses within 30 days from the receipt of the statement and requests the right to retrieve the stored remains of the sign at the time of payment, the department shall allow the party or parties to retrieve the sign remains within a reasonable period of time. If the party or parties against whom the order is directed fail to pay the itemized expenses within 30 days of the receipt of the statement, or if they timely pay the expenses but fail to request the right to retrieve the sign remains within a timely period or, if after making a timely request they fail to retrieve the sign remains within a timely period, then the department is authorized to dispose of the stored signs, or remnants thereof, in any lawful manner the department deems appropriate. Any other provisions of this or any other law to the contrary notwithstanding, any party or parties against whom any order is issued shall have the right to seek relief directly in the superior court.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, Ex. Sess., p. 5, § 19; Code 1933, § 95A-931, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1017, § 9; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 32; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that the 2000 amendment was applicable to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

32-6-97.
Construction of part.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to abrogate or affect any lawful ordinance, regulation, or resolution which is more restrictive than this part.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, Ex. Sess., p. 5, § 20; Code 1933, § 95A-932, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.